Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4420
Violations; penalties.

A risk retention group which violates any provision of the Risk Retention Act shall be subject to fines and penalties applicable to licensed insurers generally, including revocation of its license to do business in this state.

Laws 1987, LB 514, § 20.